Florida, session 2026, HB837.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
12
13 Section 1. Paragraphs (n) and (o) of subsection (7) of
14 section 125.01055, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
15 125.01055 Affordable housing.—
16 (7)
17 (n) As used in this subsection, the term:
18 1. "Commercial use" means activities associated with the
19 sale, rental, or distribution of products or the performance of
20 services related thereto. The term includes, but is not limited
21 to, such uses or activities as retail sales; wholesale sales;
22 rentals of equipment, goods, or products; offices; restaurants;
23 public lodging establishments as described in s. 509.242(1)(a);
24 food service vendors; sports arenas; theaters; tourist
25 attractions; and other for-profit business activities. A parcel
Page 1 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb837-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 837 2026
26 zoned to permit such uses by right without the requirement to
27 obtain a variance or waiver is considered commercial use for the
28 purposes of this section, irrespective of the local land
29 development regulation's listed category or title. The term does
30 not include home-based businesses or cottage food operations
31 undertaken on residential property;, public lodging
32 establishments as described in s. 509.242(1)(c); farms or farm
33 operations as defined in s. 823.14(3) or uses associated
34 therewith, including the packaging and sale of products raised
35 on the premises;, or uses that are accessory, ancillary,
36 incidental to the allowable uses, or allowed only on a temporary
37 basis. Recreational uses, such as golf courses, tennis courts,
38 swimming pools, and clubhouses, within an area designated for
39 residential use are not commercial use, irrespective of how they
40 are operated.
41 2. "Industrial use" means activities associated with the
42 manufacture, assembly, processing, or storage of products or the
43 performance of services related thereto. The term includes, but
44 is not limited to, such uses or activities as automobile
45 manufacturing or repair, boat manufacturing or repair, junk
46 yards, meat packing facilities, citrus processing and packing
47 facilities, produce processing and packing facilities,
48 electrical generating plants, water treatment plants, sewage
49 treatment plants, and solid waste disposal sites. A parcel zoned
50 to permit such uses by right without the requirement to obtain a
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb837-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 837 2026
51 variance or waiver is considered industrial use for the purposes
52 of this section, irrespective of the local land development
53 regulation's listed category or title. The term does not include
54 farms or farm operations as defined in s. 823.14(3) or uses
55 associated therewith, including the packaging and sale of
56 products raised on the premises, or uses that are accessory,
57 ancillary, incidental to the allowable uses, or allowed only on
58 a temporary basis. Recreational uses, such as golf courses,
59 tennis courts, swimming pools, and clubhouses, within an area
60 designated for residential use are not industrial use,
61 irrespective of how they are operated.
62 3. "Mixed use" means any use that combines multiple types
63 of approved land uses from at least two of the residential use,
64 commercial use, and industrial use categories. The term does not
65 include farms or farm operations as defined in s. 823.14(3) or
66 uses associated therewith, including the packaging and sale of
67 products raised on the premises, or uses that are accessory,
68 ancillary, incidental to the allowable uses, or allowed only on
69 a temporary basis. Recreational uses, such as golf courses,
70 tennis courts, swimming pools, and clubhouses, within an area
71 designated for residential use are not mixed use, irrespective
72 of how they are operated.
73 4. "Planned unit development" has the same meaning as
74 provided in s. 163.3202(5)(b).
75 (o) This subsection does not apply to:
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb837-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 837 2026
76 1. Airport-impacted areas as provided in s. 333.03.
77 2. Property defined as recreational and commercial working
78 waterfront in s. 342.201(2)(b) in any area zoned as industrial.
79 3. The Wekiva Study Area, as described in s. 369.316.
80 4. The Everglades Protection Area, as defined in s.
81 373.4592(2).
82 5. Areas subject to land development regulations as
83 defined in s. 163.3164 that are in existence before July 1,
84 2026, which are intended to retain the open character of land,
85 including, but not limited to, open space districts, open space
86 recreation districts, open use estate districts, open use rural
87 districts, and park and open space districts.
88 6. Any area of critical state concern, as designated in
89 ss. 380.055, 380.0551, 380.0552, 380.0553, and 380.0555.
90 7. The Florida wildlife corridor, as defined in s.
91 259.1055(4).
92 Section 2. Paragraphs (n) and (o) of subsection (7) of
93 section 166.04151, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
94 166.04151 Affordable housing.—
95 (7)
96 (n) As used in this subsection, the term:
97 1. "Commercial use" means activities associated with the
98 sale, rental, or distribution of products or the performance of
99 services related thereto. The term includes, but is not limited
100 to, such uses or activities as retail sales; wholesale sales;
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb837-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 837 2026
101 rentals of equipment, goods, or products; offices; restaurants;
102 public lodging establishments as described in s. 509.242(1)(a);
103 food service vendors; sports arenas; theaters; tourist
104 attractions; and other for-profit business activities. A parcel
105 zoned to permit such uses by right without the requirement to
106 obtain a variance or waiver is considered commercial use for the
107 purposes of this section, irrespective of the local land
108 development regulation's listed category or title. The term does
109 not include home-based businesses or cottage food operations
110 undertaken on residential property;, public lodging
111 establishments as described in s. 509.242(1)(c); farms or farm
112 operations as defined in s. 823.14(3) or uses associated
113 therewith, including the packaging and sale of products raised
114 on the premises;, or uses that are accessory, ancillary,
115 incidental to the allowable uses, or allowed only on a temporary
116 basis. Recreational uses, such as golf courses, tennis courts,
117 swimming pools, and clubhouses, within an area designated for
118 residential use are not commercial use, irrespective of how they
119 are operated.
120 2. "Industrial use" means activities associated with the
121 manufacture, assembly, processing, or storage of products or the
122 performance of services related thereto. The term includes, but
123 is not limited to, such uses or activities as automobile
124 manufacturing or repair, boat manufacturing or repair, junk
125 yards, meat packing facilities, citrus processing and packing
Page 5 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb837-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 837 2026
126 facilities, produce processing and packing facilities,
127 electrical generating plants, water treatment plants, sewage
128 treatment plants, and solid waste disposal sites. A parcel zoned
129 to permit such uses by right without the requirement to obtain a
130 variance or waiver is considered industrial use for the purposes
131 of this section, irrespective of the local land development
132 regulation's listed category or title. The term does not include
133 farms or farm operations as defined in s. 823.14(3) or uses
134 associated therewith, including the packaging and sale of
135 products raised on the premises, or uses that are accessory,
136 ancillary, incidental to the allowable uses, or allowed only on
137 a temporary basis. Recreational uses, such as golf courses,
138 tennis courts, swimming pools, and clubhouses, within an area
139 designated for residential use are not industrial use,
140 irrespective of how they are operated.
141 3. "Mixed use" means any use that combines multiple types
142 of approved land uses from at least two of the residential use,
143 commercial use, and industrial use categories. The term does not
144 include farms or farm operations as defined in s. 823.14(3) or
145 uses associated therewith, including the packaging and sale of
146 products raised on the premises, or uses that are accessory,
147 ancillary, incidental to the allowable uses, or allowed only on
148 a temporary basis. Recreational uses, such as golf courses,
149 tennis courts, swimming pools, and clubhouses, within an area
150 designated for residential use are not mixed use, irrespective
Page 6 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb837-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 837 2026
151 of how they are operated.
152 4. "Planned unit development" has the same meaning as
153 provided in s. 163.3202(5)(b).
154 (o) This subsection does not apply to:
155 1. Airport-impacted areas as provided in s. 333.03.
156 2. Property defined as recreational and commercial working
157 waterfront in s. 342.201(2)(b) in any area zoned as industrial.
158 3. The Wekiva Study Area, as described in s. 369.316.
159 4. The Everglades Protection Area, as defined in s.
160 373.4592(2).
161 5. Areas subject to land development regulations as
162 defined in s. 163.3164 that are in existence before July 1,
163 2026, which are intended to retain the open character of land,
164 including, but not limited to, open space districts, open space
165 recreation districts, open use estate districts, open use rural
166 districts, and park and open space districts.
167 6. Any area of critical state concern, as designated in
168 ss. 380.055, 380.0551, 380.0552, 380.0553, and 380.0555.
169 7. The Florida wildlife corridor, as defined in s.
170 259.1055(4).
171 Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 7 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb837-02-c2